Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2243
Professional corporation; real property appraisal practice.

Nothing contained in the Real Property Appraiser Act shall be deemed to prohibit any credential holder under the act from engaging in real property appraisal practice as a professional corporation in accordance with the Nebraska Professional Corporation Act.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 43;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 47;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 35;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 64;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 63;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 85.

Nebraska Professional Corporation Act, see section 21-2201.